src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON nouns
atpletums:atpletum N-MSC-1_1  "" ;
čiepsts:čiepst N-MSC-1_1  "" ;
ekonoms:ekonom N-MSC-1_1  "" ;
hidropults:hidropult N-MSC-1_1  "" ;
izkarojums:izkarojum N-MSC-1_1  "" ;
kauleņkoks:kauleņkok N-MSC-1_1  "" ;
korektums:korektum N-MSC-1_1  "" ;
leduslaukums:leduslaukum N-MSC-1_1  "" ;
mecosoprāns:mecosoprān N-MSC-1_1  "" ;
nacionālšovinists:nacionālšovinist N-MSC-1_1  "" ;
noskalojums:noskalojum N-MSC-1_1  "" ;
pankreass:pankreas N-MSC-1_1  "" ;
pēcmodernists:pēcmodernist N-MSC-1_1  "" ;
pjezokristāls:pjezokristāl N-MSC-1_1  "" ;
propagandētājs:propagandētāj N-MSC-1_1  "" ;
redzeslauks:redzeslauk N-MSC-1_1  "" ;
saharimetrs:saharimetr N-MSC-1_1  "" ;
servodzinējs:servodzinēj N-MSC-1_1  "" ;
smārds:smārd N-MSC-1_1  "" ;
stereotelevizors:stereotelevizor N-MSC-1_1  "" ;
šmīksts:šmīkst N-MSC-1_1  "" ;
traģikomiskums:traģikomiskum N-MSC-1_1  "" ;
uvāls:uvāl N-MSC-1_1  "" ;
veidmāls:veidmāl N-MSC-1_1  "" ;
brauniņš:brauniņ N-MSC-2_1  "" ;
diedziņš:diedziņ N-MSC-2_1  "" ;
ganceļš:ganceļ N-MSC-2_1  "" ;
jātnieciņš:jātnieciņ N-MSC-2_1  "" ;
koveriņš:koveriņ N-MSC-2_1  "" ;
ķoniņš:ķoniņ N-MSC-2_1  "" ;
likteņvējš:likteņvēj N-MSC-2_1  "" ;
neceļš:neceļ N-MSC-2_1  "" ;
paibērniņš:paibērniņ N-MSC-2_1  "" ;
pārkaimiņš:pārkaimiņ N-MSC-2_1  "" ;
pērkonamoliņš:pērkonamoliņ N-MSC-2_1  "" ;
pieveddzelzceļš:pieveddzelzceļ N-MSC-2_1  "" ;
plaktiņš:plaktiņ N-MSC-2_1  "" ;
plītiņš:plītiņ N-MSC-2_1  "" ;
puskažociņš:puskažociņ N-MSC-2_1  "" ;
putekšņmaciņš:putekšņmaciņ N-MSC-2_1  "" ;
raskrēsliņš:raskrēsliņ N-MSC-2_1  "" ;
robežceļš:robežceļ N-MSC-2_1  "" ;
sausvējš:sausvēj N-MSC-2_1  "" ;
skaistumpunktiņš:skaistumpunktiņ N-MSC-2_1  "" ;
staciņš:staciņ N-MSC-2_1  "" ;
vairodziņš:vairodziņ N-MSC-2_1  "" ;
virsvējš:virsvēj N-MSC-2_1  "" ;
bairītis:bairīt N-MSC-3_2  "" ;
burkšis:burkš N-MSC-3_2  "" ;
dienvidrietenis:dienvidrieten N-MSC-3_2  "" ;
dzeroklis:dzerokl N-MSC-3_2  "" ;
gausulis:gausul N-MSC-3_2  "" ;
ievadtonis:ievadton N-MSC-3_2  "" ;
kamšķis:kamšķ N-MSC-3_2  "" ;
klānis:klān N-MSC-3_2  "" ;
konfūcietis:konfūciet N-MSC-3_2  "" ;
kriukšķis:kriukšķ N-MSC-3_2  "" ;
literatūrteorētiķis:literatūrteorētiķ N-MSC-3_2  "" ;
mozaiķis:mozaiķ N-MSC-3_2  "" ;
numerālis:numerāl N-MSC-3_2  "" ;
pavaldonis:pavaldon N-MSC-3_2  "" ;
plostķīlis:plostķīl N-MSC-3_2  "" ;
radioorientieris:radioorientier N-MSC-3_2  "" ;
saliecenis:saliecen N-MSC-3_2  "" ;
skrotzīmulis:skrotzīmul N-MSC-3_2  "" ;
staieris:staier N-MSC-3_2  "" ;
šāvējgurķis:šāvējgurķ N-MSC-3_2  "" ;
trijskanis:trijskan N-MSC-3_2  "" ;
vējadēlis:vējadēl N-MSC-3_2  "" ;
zieķis:zieķ N-MSC-3_2  "" ;
bacils:bacil N-MSC-5_2  "" ;
baidēkls:baidēkl N-MSC-5_2  "" ;
baidīkls:baidīkl N-MSC-5_2  "" ;
durkls:durkl N-MSC-5_2  "" ;
okšķerētājsuns:okšķerētājsun N-MSC-5_2  "" ;
onkols:onkol N-MSC-5_2  "" ;
rējējsuns:rējējsun N-MSC-5_2  "" ;
uzmeklētājsuns:uzmeklētājsun N-MSC-5_2  "" ;
veconkols:veconkol N-MSC-5_2  "" ;
vējasuns:vējasun N-MSC-5_2  "" ;
ateroma:aterom N-FEM-7_4  "" ;
brīvdomātāja:brīvdomātāj N-FEM-7_4  "" ;
dievturība:dievturīb N-FEM-7_4  "" ;
epigrāfika:epigrāfik N-FEM-7_4  "" ;
ģermānistika:ģermānistik N-FEM-7_4  "" ;
izcēlāja:izcēlāj N-FEM-7_4  "" ;
kāpinātāja:kāpinātāj N-FEM-7_4  "" ;
komentētāja:komentētāj N-FEM-7_4  "" ;
kreozoteļļa:kreozoteļļ N-FEM-7_4  "" ;
lejdaļa:lejdaļ N-FEM-7_4  "" ;
mahonija:mahonij N-FEM-7_4  "" ;
meteorogrāfija:meteorogrāfij N-FEM-7_4  "" ;
narkotizācija:narkotizācij N-FEM-7_4  "" ;
noģieda:noģied N-FEM-7_4  "" ;
paisītava:paisītav N-FEM-7_4  "" ;
pārmantotība:pārmantotīb N-FEM-7_4  "" ;
pirmstadija:pirmstadij N-FEM-7_4  "" ;
radioklausītāja:radioklausītāj N-FEM-7_4  "" ;
saērcinātība:saērcinātīb N-FEM-7_4  "" ;
skabargainība:skabargainīb N-FEM-7_4  "" ;
stereoprogramma:stereoprogramm N-FEM-7_4  "" ;
teokrātija:teokrātij N-FEM-7_4  "" ;
vairākumtautība:vairākumtautīb N-FEM-7_4  "" ;
zariņbarība:zariņbarīb N-FEM-7_4  "" ;
atomlokomotīve:atomlokomotīv N-FEM-9_5  "" ;
cimbāliste:cimbālist N-FEM-9_5  "" ;
elektiķe:elektiķ N-FEM-9_5  "" ;
grafomāne:grafomān N-FEM-9_5  "" ;
ingušiete:ingušiet N-FEM-9_5  "" ;
karioze:karioz N-FEM-9_5  "" ;
komtese:komtes N-FEM-9_5  "" ;
kurdiete:kurdiet N-FEM-9_5  "" ;
liriķe:liriķ N-FEM-9_5  "" ;
metāliste:metālist N-FEM-9_5  "" ;
naftiniece:naftiniec N-FEM-9_5  "" ;
ņaudule:ņaudul N-FEM-9_5  "" ;
paralēlklase:paralēlklas N-FEM-9_5  "" ;
pentode:pentod N-FEM-9_5  "" ;
politoloģe:politoloģ N-FEM-9_5  "" ;
radiokonstruktore:radiokonstruktor N-FEM-9_5  "" ;
rigiditāte:rigiditāt N-FEM-9_5  "" ;
savilce:savilc N-FEM-9_5  "" ;
skatcaurule:skatcaurul N-FEM-9_5  "" ;
spleise:spleis N-FEM-9_5  "" ;
surdoloģe:surdoloģ N-FEM-9_5  "" ;
tiesekspertīze:tiesekspertīz N-FEM-9_5  "" ;
veidēvele:veidēvel N-FEM-9_5  "" ;
darbļaudis:darbļaudi N-FEM-11_6  "" ;
hercogvalsts:hercogvalst N-FEM-11_6  "" ;
ķeizarvalsts:ķeizarvalst N-FEM-11_6  "" ;
mājļaudis:mājļaudi N-FEM-11_6  "" ;
mūsļaudis:mūsļaudi N-FEM-11_6  "" ;
padomjļaudis:padomjļaudi N-FEM-11_6  "" ;
pusvalsts:pusvalst N-FEM-11_6  "" ;
superlielvalsts:superlielvalst N-FEM-11_6  "" ;
viņļaudis:viņļaudi N-FEM-11_6  "" ;
aids:aids N--12_Nepiemīt  "" ;
aizmārša:aizmārš N-MSC-8_4  "" ;
apakšģints:apakšģint N-FEM-11_6  "" ;
asinssuns:asinssun N-MSC-5_2  "" ;
asmens:asmen N-MSC-4_2  "" ;
ass:as N-FEM-11_6  "" ;
aunapiere:aunapier N-MSC-10_5  "" ;
auša:auš N-MSC-8_4  "" ;
balamute:balamut N-MSC-10_5  "" ;
balss:bals N-FEM-11_6  "" ;
bende:bend N-MSC-10_5  "" ;
bendžo:bendžo N--12_Nepiemīt  "" ;
bezlietus:bezliet N-MSC-6_3  "" ;
bezvēsts:bezvēst N-FEM-11_6  "" ;
bufervalsts:bufervalst N-FEM-11_6  "" ;
caurvējš:caurvēj N-MSC-2_1  "" ;
debesis:debes N-FEM-11_6  "" ;
debisī:debisī N--12_Nepiemīt  "" ;
durvis:durv N-FEM-11_6  "" ;
dzinējsuns:dzinējsun N-MSC-5_2  "" ;
dūksts:dūkst N-FEM-11_6  "" ;
glūņa:glūņ N-MSC-8_4  "" ;
govs:gov N-FEM-11_6  "" ;
gremža:gremž N-MSC-8_4  "" ;
gulšņa:gulšņ N-MSC-8_4  "" ;
guļava:guļav N-MSC-8_4  "" ;
haki:haki N--12_Nepiemīt  "" ;
iztapoņa:iztapoņ N-MSC-8_4  "" ;
kanoe:kanoe N--12_Nepiemīt  "" ;
kapakmens:kapakmen N-MSC-4_2  "" ;
kapučino:kapučino N--12_Nepiemīt  "" ;
kapučīno:kapučīno N--12_Nepiemīt  "" ;
karaļvalsts:karaļvalst N-FEM-11_6  "" ;
katlakmens:katlakmen N-MSC-4_2  "" ;
kaļķakmens:kaļķakmen N-MSC-4_2  "" ;
kekss:keks N-MSC-1_1  "" ;
koļa:koļ N-MSC-8_4  "" ;
lauva:lauv N-MSC-8_4  "" ;
lielvalsts:lielvalst N-FEM-11_6  "" ;
ložņa:ložņ N-MSC-8_4  "" ;
miegamice:miegamic N-MSC-10_5  "" ;
mis:mis N--12_Nepiemīt  "" ;
misis:misis N--12_Nepiemīt  "" ;
muldoņa:muldoņ N-MSC-8_4  "" ;
muļļa:muļļ N-MSC-8_4  "" ;
mēnesakmens:mēnesakmen N-MSC-4_2  "" ;
mēness:mēnes N-MSC-4_2  "" ;
nelga:nelg N-MSC-8_4  "" ;
nepraša:nepraš N-MSC-8_4  "" ;
opel:opel N--12_Nepiemīt  "" ;
pamatakmens:pamatakmen N-MSC-4_2  "" ;
pilnmēness:pilnmēnes N-MSC-4_2  "" ;
plikadīda:plikadīd N-MSC-8_4  "" ;
plukata:plukat N-MSC-8_4  "" ;
pluska:plusk N-MSC-8_4  "" ;
priekšass:priekšas N-FEM-11_6  "" ;
pusmēness:pusmēnes N-MSC-4_2  "" ;
pļāpa:pļāp N-MSC-8_4  "" ;
renault:renault N--12_Nepiemīt  "" ;
robežakmens:robežakmen N-MSC-4_2  "" ;
robežvalsts:robežvalst N-FEM-11_6  "" ;
roklaiža:roklaiž N-MSC-8_4  "" ;
sargsuns:sargsun N-MSC-5_2  "" ;
slepkava:slepkav N-MSC-8_4  "" ;
smilšakmens:smilšakmen N-MSC-4_2  "" ;
smulē:smulē N--12_Nepiemīt  "" ;
stūrakmens:stūrakmen N-MSC-4_2  "" ;
suns:sun N-MSC-5_2  "" ;
takts:takt N-FEM-11_6  "" ;
utubunga:utubung N-MSC-8_4  "" ;
vēršacs:vēršac N-FEM-11_6  "" ;
vīnakmens:vīnakmen N-MSC-4_2  "" ;
zaķapastala:zaķapastal N-MSC-8_4  "" ;
zilbe:zilb N-FEM-9_5  "" ;
zilkrūtītis:zilkrūtīt N-MSC-3_2  "" ;
čamma:čamm N-MSC-8_4  "" ;
ģipšakmens:ģipšakmen N-MSC-4_2  "" ;
īstermiņa:īstermiņ N-MSC-2_1  "" ;
šūnakmens:šūnakmen N-MSC-4_2  "" ;
žūpa:žūp N-MSC-8_4  "" ;
